North Carolina, session 2025, SB657.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 105-113.128 reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-113.128. Use of tax proceeds.
The Secretary shall distribute the taxes collected under this Article, less the allowance to the
Department of Revenue and reimbursement to the Lottery Commission for administrative
expenses, in accordance with this section. The Secretary may retain the cost of administering this
Article, not to exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) a year, as reimbursement to the
Department. The Lottery Commission shall, no later than 20 days after the end of the month,
notify the Department of its unreimbursed expenses from administering the provisions of Article
9 of Chapter 18C of the General Statutes from the previous month. The Department shall
reimburse the Lottery Commission from the tax revenues collected under this Article no later
than the end of the month in which the Department was notified. The remainder of the net
proceeds of the tax collected under this Article are to be credited in the following priority:
…
(3a) Eleven million dollars ($11,000,000) annually to the Department of Public
Instruction to be allocated to eligible public school units to provide salary
supplements to all eligible athletic coaches to ensure that each eligible athletic
coach receives a total annual salary supplement for serving as an athletic
coach of at least three thousand dollars ($3,000) in State and non-State funds.
An eligible public school unit that provided non-State funds for salary
supplements for athletic coaches in the prior school year shall continue to
provide at least that amount of non-State funds for salary supplements for
athletic coaches. Any public school unit that supplants funds provided under
this subdivision for salary supplements for athletic coaches shall not receive
State funds for salary supplements in the subsequent school year. If there are
any unexpended funds from this allocation at the end of the fiscal year, the
Department shall allocate those funds to the North Carolina Alliance of
YMCAs, Inc. to support youth sports programming in the State. For purposes
of this subdivision, the following definitions shall apply:
a. Eligible athletic coach. – A person employed full-time in a public
school unit who serves as an athletic coach and who receives a salary
supplement from non-State funds for serving as an athletic coach that
*S657-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
is equal to or less than three thousand dollars ($3,000) each school
year.
b. Eligible public school unit. – A public school unit that reports to the
Department of Public Instruction by August 15 of each year on the
amount of non-State funds provided for salary supplements for athletic
coaches in the prior school year.
…."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
Page 2 Senate Bill 657-First Edition